Massachusetts, session 194th, H1532.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a 
special commission to study and provide recommendations on the potential economic and social 
impacts of shifting the responsibility of paying real estate broker fees from tenants to landlords 
in residential leasing transactions within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.  
The commission shall investigate and document the following: (1) the economic burden 
on landlords and tenants resulting from such a policy change; (2) the effects on the rental 
housing market, including affordability, availability, and stability; (3) the impacts on real estate 
brokerage practices and fees; (4) comparisons with jurisdictions that have implemented similar 
policies; and (5) any anticipated legal, regulatory, or practical challenges.  
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the secretary of housing and livable 
communities, or a designee, who shall serve as chair; 1 member of the house of representatives 

of 2 12 appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 1 member of the senate appointed by 
the president of the senate; 1 member of the house of representatives appointed by the minority 
leader of the house of representatives; 1 member of the senate appointed by the minority leader 
of the senate; 2 members appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall represent the 
Massachusetts Association of Realtors, and 1 of whom shall represent a tenant advocacy 
organization; and one economist with expertise in housing policy, to be appointed by the 
governor.  
SECTION 3. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall provide 
technical and administrative support to the commission. The commission shall hold at least 3 
public hearings in geographically diverse regions of the commonwealth to solicit feedback from 
tenants, landlords, brokers, and other stakeholders.  
SECTION 4. The commission shall file its report, including its findings and 
recommendations, along with any drafts of proposed legislation, with the clerks of the house of 
representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, and the 
joint committee on housing no later than 12 months after the effective date of this act.